Arkansas, session 2025, HB1515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-61-111, concerning ordering the
organized militia into service, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(c) With the approval of the Governor, the Adjutant General shall have
power to order into the active service of the state for such a period, to
such extent, and in such manner as he or she may deem necessary part of the
Arkansas National Guard for:
(1) Matters related to the execution of military justice within
§§ 12-64-403 — 12-64-405, § 12-64-407, §§ 12-64-409 — 12-64-412, § 12-64-414,
§ 12-64-504, § 12-64-510, § 12-64-517, § 12-64-606, § 12-64-707, § 12-64-709,
and § 12-64-710 for an accused, a witness, prosecution counsel, defense
*ZRC020*
03-10-2025 11:36:03 ZRC020

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1515
counsel, a paralegal, a military judge, a preliminary hearing officer, a
deposition officer, a marshal, a bailiff, a court reporter, or a panel member
when duty status orders under Title 32 of the United States Code are
unavailable; or
(2) Voluntary support in a state active-duty status of the
Arkansas National Guard to address critical staffing shortages related to
security and essential military operations.

/s/Painter



























03-10-2025 11:36:03 ZRC020